Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,282
Immunity from liability; exceptions.

(1) A person who donates fire control or rescue equipment to a fire department or a political subdivision for use by its fire department shall not be liable for civil damages for personal injuries, property damage or loss, or death caused by the fire control or rescue equipment after donation, except for injury, damage, loss, or death caused by the donor's intentional or reckless conduct or gross negligence.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a vendor or manufacturer of fire control or rescue equipment.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) Fire control or rescue equipment means any vehicle, equipment, tool, communications equipment, or protective gear used in firefighting, rescue services, or emergency medical services;

(b) Fire department means any paid or volunteer fire department, company, association, or organization or first-aid, rescue, or emergency squad serving a city, village, county, township, or rural or suburban fire protection district or any other public or private fire department; and

(c) Person means any individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, fire department, public corporation, other legal or commercial entity, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

Laws 2007, LB160, § 1.